Hawaii statutes.
§329-14 Schedule I. (a) The
controlled substances listed in this section are included in schedule I.

(b) Any of the following opiates, including
their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers,
unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters,
ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation:

(1) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl
(N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);

(2) Acetylmethadol;

(3) Allylprodine;

(4) Alphacetylmethadol (except
levo-alphacetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM);

(5) Alphameprodine;

(6) Alphamethadol;

(7) Alpha-methylfentanyl
(N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl)ethyl-4-piperidyl] propionanilide;
1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido) piperidine);

(8) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl
(N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

(9) Benzethidine;

(10) Betacetylmethadol;

(11) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl
(N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

(12) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl
(N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

(13) Betameprodine;

(14) Betamethadol;

(15) Betaprodine;

(16) Clonitazene;

(17) Dextromoramide;

(18) Diampromide;

(19) Diethylthiambutene;

(20) Difenoxin;

(21) Dimenoxadol;

(22) Dimepheptanol;

(23) Dimethylthiambutene;

(24) Dioxaphetyl butyrate;

(25) Dipipanone;

(26) Ethylmethylthiambutene;

(27) Etonitazene;

(28) Etoxeridine;

(29) Furethidine;

(30) Hydroxypethidine;

(31) Ketobemidone;

(32) Levomoramide;

(33) Levophenacylmorphan;

(34) 3-Methylfentanyl
(N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

(35) 3-methylthiofentanyl
(N-[3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

(36) Morpheridine;

(37) MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);

(38) Noracymethadol;

(39) Norlevorphanol;

(40) Normethadone;

(41) Norpipanone;

(42) Para-fluorofentanyl
(N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide;

(43) PEPAP
(1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine;

(44) Phenadoxone;

(45) Phenampromide;

(46) Phenomorphan;

(47) Phenoperidine;

(48) Piritramide;

(49) Proheptazine;

(50) Properidine;

(51) Propiram;

(52) Racemoramide;

(53) Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-propanamide);

(54) Tilidine;

(55) Trimeperidine;

(56) N-[1-benzyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide
(benzylfentanyl), its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;

(57) N-[1-(2-thienyl)methyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide
(thenylfentanyl), its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers; and

(58) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide,
(acetyl fentanyl) its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and
salts of isomers.

(c) Any of the following opium derivatives,
their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted,
whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation:

(1) Acetorphine;

(2) Acetyldihydrocodeine;

(3) Benzylmorphine;

(4) Codeine methylbromide;

(5) Codeine-N-Oxide;

(6) Cyprenorphine;

(7) Desomorphine;

(8) Dihydromorphine;

(9) Drotebanol;

(10) Etorphine;

(11) Heroin;

(12) Hydromorphinol;

(13) Methyldesorphine;

(14) Methyldihydromorphine;

(15) Morphine methylbromide;

(16) Morphine methylsulfonate;

(17) Morphine-N-Oxide;

(18) Myrophine;

(19) Nicocodeine;

(20) Nicomorphine;

(21) Normorphine;

(22) Phoclodine; and

(23) Thebacon.

(d) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
that contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances, their
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever
the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within
the specific chemical designation:

(1) Alpha-ethyltryptamine (AET);

(2) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine (DOET);

(3) 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine (2,5-DMA);

(4) 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;

(5) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);

(6) N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine
(N-hydroxy-MDA);

(7) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine (MDE);

(8) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine;

(9) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine
(4-bromo-2,5-DMA);

(10) 4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine (Nexus);

(11) 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;

(12) Bufotenine;

(13) 4-methoxyamphetamine (PMA);

(14) Diethyltryptamine;

(15) Dimethyltryptamine;

(16) 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine;

(17) Gamma hydroxybutyrate (GHB) (some other names
include gamma hydroxybutyric acid; 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutanoic acid;
sodium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate);

(18) Ibogaine;

(19) Lysergic acid diethylamide;

(20) Marijuana;

(21) Parahexyl;

(22) Mescaline;

(23) Peyote;

(24) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;

(25) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;

(26) Psilocybin;

(27) Psilocyn;

(28) 1-[1-(2-Thienyl) cyclohexyl] Pyrrolidine (TCPy);

(29) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine (PCE);

(30) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine (PCPy, PHP);

(31) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine (TPCP; TCP);

(32) Gamma-butyrolactone, including butyrolactone;
butyrolactone gamma; 4-butyrolactone; 2(3H)-furanone dihydro;
dihydro-2(3H)furanone; tetrahydro-2-furanone; 1,2-butanolide; 1,4-butanolide;
4-butanolide; gamma-hydroxybutyric acid lactone; 3-hydroxybutyric acid lactone
and 4-hydroxybutanoic acid lactone with Chemical Abstract Service number
96-48-0 when any such substance is intended for human ingestion;

(33) 1,4 butanediol, including butanediol;
butane-1,4-diol; 1,4- butylenes glycol; butylene glycol; 1,4-dihydroxybutane;
1,4- tetramethylene glycol; tetramethylene glycol; tetramethylene 1,4- diol
with Chemical Abstract Service number 110-63-4 when any such substance is
intended for human ingestion;

(34) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine
(2C-T-7), its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;

(35) N-benzylpiperazine (BZP; 1-benzylpiperazine) its
optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;

(36) 1-(3-trifluoromethylphenyl)piperazine (TFMPP),
its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;

(37) Alpha-methyltryptamine (AMT), its isomers, salts,
and salts of isomers;

(38) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (5-MeO-DIPT),
its isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;

(39) Salvia divinorum;

(40) Salvinorin A;

(41) Divinorin A;

(42) 5-Methoxy-N,N-Dimethyltryptamine (5-MeO-DIPT) (some
trade or other names: 5-methoxy-3-[2-(dimethylamino)ethyl]indole; 5-MeO-DMT);

(43) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-E);

(44) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl)ethanamine
(2C-D);

(45) 2-(4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine
(2C-C);

(46) 2-(4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-I);

(47) 2-[4-(Ethylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine
(2C-T-2);

(48) 2-[4-(Isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine
(2C-T-4);

(49) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-H);

(50) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl)ethanamine
(2C-N);

(51) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl)ethanamine
(2C-P);

(52) 2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine,
its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers
(Other names: 25I-NBOMe; 2C-I-NBOMe; 25I; Cimbi-5);

(53) 2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine,
its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers
(Other names: 25C-NBOMe; 2C-C-NBOMe; 25C; Cimbi-82); and

(54) 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine,
its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers
(Other names: 25B-NBOMe; 2C-B-NBOMe; 25B; Cimbi-36).

(e) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted,
the schedule shall include any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
which contains any quantity of the substance:

(1) Mecloqualone; or

(2) Methaqualone.

(f) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted
or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or
preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a
stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers,
and salts of isomers:

(1) Aminorex;

(2) Cathinone;

(3) Fenethylline;

(4) Methcathinone;

(5) N-ethylamphetamine;

(6) 4-methylaminorex;

(7) N,N-dimethylamphetamine; and

(8) Substituted cathinones, any compound, except
bupropion or compounds listed under a different schedule, structurally derived
from 2-aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with either phenyl,
naphthyl, or thiophene ring systems, whether or not the compound is further
modified in any of the following ways:

(A) By substitution in the ring system to any
extent with alkyl, alkylenedioxy, alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide
substituents, whether or not further substituted in the ring system by one or
more other univalent substituents;

(B) By substitution at the 3-position with an
acyclic alkyl substituent; or

(C) By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen
atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl, or methoxybenzyl groups, or by inclusion of
the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure.

Some other trade names: Mephedrone
(2-methylamino-1-p-tolylpropan-1-one), also known as 4-methylmethcathinone
(4-MMC), methylephedrone or MMCAT; Methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MDPV, MDPK);
methylone or 3,4-methylenedioxymethcathinone; and
1-(benzo[d][1,3]dioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)propan-1-one, monohydrochloride,
also known as Ethylone, bk-MDEA hydrochloride, MDEC;
3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone; bk-Methylenedioxyethylamphetamine.

(g) Any of the following cannabinoids, their
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever
the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within
the specific chemical designation:

(1) Tetrahydrocannabinols; meaning
tetrahydrocannabinols naturally contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis
(cannabis plant), as well as synthetic equivalents of the substances contained
in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, sp. or synthetic
substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and
pharmacological activity to those substances contained in the plant, such as
the following: Delta 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers; Delta 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers;
and Delta 3,4 cis or trans-tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers (since
nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standardized, compounds
of these structures, regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions,
are covered);

(2) Naphthoylindoles; meaning any compound containing
a 3-(1-naphthoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
indole ring by a alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl) methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl) ethyl group, whether or
not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent;

(3) Naphthylmethylindoles; meaning any compound
containing a 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl) methane structure with substitution at
the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by a alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl) methyl or
2-(4-morpholinyl) ethyl group whether or not further substituted in the indole
ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any
extent;

(4) Naphthoylpyrroles; meaning any compound containing
a 3-(1-naphthoyl) pyrrole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of
the pyrrole ring by a alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl) methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl) ethyl
group whether or not further substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent,
whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent;

(5) Naphthylmethylindenes; meaning any compound
containing a naphthylideneindene structure with substitution at the 3-position
of the indene ring by a alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl) methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl) ethyl
group whether or not further substituted in the indene ring to any extent,
whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent;

(6) Phenylacetylindoles; meaning any compound
containing a 3-phenylacetylindole structure with substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by a alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl) methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl) ethyl
group whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent,
whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent;

(7) Cyclohexylphenols; meaning any compound
containing a 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl) phenol structure with substitution at the
5-position of the phenolic ring by a alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl) methyl or
2-(4-morpholinyl) ethyl group whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring
to any extent;

(8) Benzoylindoles; meaning any compound containing a
3-(benzoyl) indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
indole ring by a alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl) methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl) ethyl group whether or
not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent;

(9) 2,3-Dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4-morpholinylmethyl)
pyrrolo[1,2,3-de]-1,4-benzoxazin-6-yl]-1-naphthalenylmethanone (another trade
name is WIN 55,212-2);

(10) (6a,10a)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,
6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol
(other trade names are: HU-210 and HU-211);

(11) Tetramethylcyclopropanoylindoles; meaning any
compound containing a 3-tetramethylcyclopropanoylindole structure with
substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or
tetrahydropyranylmethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indole
ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the tetramethylcyclopropyl
ring to any extent;

(12) N-(1-adamantyl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide,
its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers
(Other names: APINACA, AKB48);

(13) Quinolin-8-yl 1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxylate,
its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers
(Other names: PB-22; QUPIC);

(14) Quinolin-8-yl
1-(5fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate, its optical, positional, and
geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: 5-fluoro-PB-22; 5F-PB-22);

(15) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide,
its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers
(Other names: AB-FUBINACA);

(16) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide,
its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers
(Other names: ADB-PINACA);

(17) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide,
its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers
(Other names: AB-CHMINACA);

(18) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide,
and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: AB-PINACA);

(19) [1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazol-3-yl](naphthalen-1-yl)methanone,
and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: THJ-2201);

(20) Methyl (1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1
H-indazole-3-carbonyl)-L-valinate, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
isomers (Other names: FUB-AMB);

(21) (S)-methyl
2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate, and
geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: 5-fluoro-AMB,
5-fluoro-AMP);

(22) N-((3s,5s,7s)-adamantan-1-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide,
and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: AKB48 N-(5-fluoropentyl)
analog, 5F-AKB48, APINACA 5-fluoropentyl analog, 5F-APINACA);

(23) N-adamantyl-1-fluoropentylindole-3-Carboxamide, and
geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: STS-135, 5F-APICA;
5-fluoro-APICA);

(24) Naphthalen-1-yl
1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-caboxylate, and geometric isomers, salts, and
salts of isomers (Other names: NM2201); and

(25) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide,
and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: MAB-CHMINACA
and ADB-CHMINACA). [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1; am L 1974, c 217, §1; am L 1977, c
116, §1; am L 1978, c 68, §2; am L 1979, c 194, §1; am L 1980, c 140, §1 and c
232, §16; am L 1984, c 166, §1; am L 1985, c 150, §1; am L 1986, c 214, §§2, 3;
am L 1988, c 59, §1; am L 1990, c 138, §3; am L 1993, c 8, §1; am L 1995, c
122, §1; am L 1997, c 356, §1; am L 1999, c 252, §2; am L 2000, c 98, §1; am L
2001, c 203, §2; am L 2003, c 151, §§1, 2; am L 2008, c 119, §3; am L 2010, c
123, §1; am L 2011, c 73, §1; am L 2012, c 29, §1; am L 2013, c 48, §1; am L
2014, c 54, §1; am L 2015, c 195, §1; am L 2016, c 218, §§2, 3]

Case Notes

Proscription of distribution of lysergic acid
"diethylamine" under this section (1974) cannot be extended by
analogy under §701-104 to distribution of lysergic acid diethylamide. 61 H.
74, 595 P.2d 288.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next